Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 30 CREDIT UNIONS - GENERAL PROVISIONS
11-30-125. Notice of branch opening and closing.

A credit union that has its principal place of business in this state may establish one or more new branches anywhere in this state or in any other state thirty days after providing written notice to the commissioner.

No later than ninety days prior to the proposed date of any branch closing, a notice of branch closing shall be filed with the commissioner. The notice of branch closing shall include a detailed statement of the reasons for the decision to close the branch and statistical or other information in support of such reasons.

The commissioner may enter into agreements with other state credit union regulators for the purposes of examination and supervision of out-of-state offices.

Nothing in this section may be construed to supersede any requirement set forth in section 11-30-101.7.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 135, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (3) and (4) added, (SB 20-068), ch. 152, p. 654, § 1, effective September 14.

11-30-126. Trust account - limited documentation required - certificate of trust.

For any transaction with any credit union in this state by one or more persons expressly acting as a trustee or trustees for one or more other named person or persons pursuant to or purporting to be pursuant to a written trust agreement, a trustee may provide the credit union with a certificate of trust to evidence the trust relationship. The certificate of trust must be a duly acknowledged affidavit executed by any trustee and must include the following:

A statement that the trust exists and the date the trust instrument was executed;

The identity of the settlor;

The identity and address of the current acting trustee;

The powers of the trustee in the pending transaction;

A statement whether the trust is revocable and the identity of any person holding the power to revoke the trust;

The authority of cotrustees to sign or otherwise authenticate and whether all or fewer than all cotrustees are required in order to exercise the powers of the trustee;

The name in which title to trust property may be taken; and

Any other information that may be required by the credit union, including an indemnification that is acceptable to the credit union.

If a credit union decides to accept a certificate of trust pursuant to this section:

For a transaction that consists of opening a deposit account, the credit union may administer the account in accordance with the certificate of trust without requiring receipt of a copy of the written trust agreement; and

For a transaction that consists of obtaining, guaranteeing, or encumbering trust property to secure a loan, or entering into any agreement with a credit union, the trustee or trustees shall be conclusively presumed to have had the authority specified in the trust certificate for purposes of determining whether the trustees were acting within their authority in entering into, or causing the trust to enter into, a transaction, even if the certificate of trust is contrary to the terms of the written trust agreement, unless the credit union has actual knowledge that the terms of the written trust agreement are contrary to the terms of the certificate of trust.

If a credit union decides to accept a certificate of trust in opening a deposit account pursuant to this section, upon the death, resignation, or adjudication of incompetence of all named trustees and successor trustees noted on the certificate of trust, the credit union may withhold disposition of any funds on deposit in the account until receipt of one of the following:

An order by a court of competent jurisdiction directing the disposition of funds;

A newly executed certificate of trust created pursuant to this section from a person acting or purporting to act as a newly appointed successor trustee under the same trust; or

Other documentation that establishes to the satisfaction of the credit union the manner in which the funds are to be administered or distributed.

If a credit union decides to accept a certificate of trust in opening a deposit account pursuant to this section, the credit union shall not be liable for administering the account as provided by the certificate of trust, even if the certificate of trust is contrary to the terms of the written trust agreement, unless the credit union has actual knowledge that the terms of the written trust agreement are contrary to the terms of the certificate of trust.

Nothing in this section obligates a credit union to enter into a transaction with a trustee who refuses to furnish the credit union with a copy of a written trust agreement. In addition, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a credit union from requesting additional information in order to enter into a transaction with a trustee, including a request that the certificate of trust be executed by all trustees.

Knowledge of the terms of a written trust agreement may not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of a written trust agreement is held by the person relying upon the certification or affidavit.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1157), ch. 77, p. 242, § 2, effective March 23.